Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3187.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-19.3-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-19.3 entitled
"Regulation of Rental of Motorized Bicycles, Motor Scooters and Motorized Tricycles in New
Shoreham" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-19.3-5. Ordinances.
(a) The town council of the town of New Shoreham may enact reasonable ordinances
establishing procedures and standards for the licensing, supervision, regulation, and control of the
rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and motorized tricycles.
(b) An ordinance enacted pursuant to this section may:
(1) Establish a fee to be charged for the issuance or renewal of any license for the rental of
motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles the holder of the license is authorized
to rent or lease and shall not exceed the sum of forty dollars ($40.00) per motorized bicycle, motor
scooters or motorized tricycle.
(2) Establish a maximum number of licenses, not to exceed that authorized by subsection
(c) of this section, which may be adjusted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, which may be
granted for the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles.
(3) Establish hours during which motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized
tricycles may be rented.
(4) Establish a maximum number of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized

tricycles which a license holder may rent or lease under the license, which shall not exceed thirty-
four (34) motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles.
(5) Provide that no motorized bicycle, motor scooters or motorized tricycle shall be rented
or leased in the town of New Shoreham unless the operator thereof has a valid license issued under
the provisions of § 31-10-1, or a similar license issued by a state other than Rhode Island.
(6) Require all motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized tricycles to pass
inspection annually and be issued a certificate by a duly authorized state inspection facility
indicating that the vehicle has passed inspection to be conducted at inspection agencies which shall
be created and governed by rules and regulations promulgated by the department of revenue.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the town council of the town of
New Shoreham shall not grant more than five (5) licenses, which may be adjusted pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section, for the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized
tricycles.
(d) Upon the voluntary surrender, expiration without renewal, revocation, or other
retirement of a license for the rental of motorized bicycles, motor scooters and/or motorized
tricycles, the maximum number of licenses authorized under subsection (c) of this section, shall be
permanently reduced by one for each license voluntarily surrendered, expired without renewal,
revoked, or otherwise retired.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006273
========
LC006273 - Page 2 of 3